Mississippi statutes. Title 31. Public Business, Bonds and Obligations
In General
Purchases of Mississippi Industries for the Blind products. Purchases made by state agencies or governing authorities involving any item that is manufactured, processed or produced by the Mississippi Industries for the Blind.

Purchases of state-adopted textbooks. Purchases of state-adopted textbooks by public school districts.

Certain purchases under the Mississippi Major Economic Impact Act. Contracts entered into pursuant to the provisions of Section 57-75-9(2), (3) and (4).

Used heavy or specialized machinery or equipment for installation of soil and water conservation practices purchased at auction. Used heavy or specialized machinery or equipment used for the installation and implementation of soil and water conservation practices or measures purchased subject to the restrictions provided in Sections 69-27-331 through 69-27-341. Any purchase by the State Soil and Water Conservation Commission under the exemption authorized by this subparagraph shall require advance authorization spread upon the minutes of the commission to include the listing of the item or items authorized to be purchased and the maximum bid authorized to be paid for each item or items.

Hospital lease of equipment or services. Leases by hospitals of equipment or services if the leases are in compliance with paragraph (l)(ii).

Purchases made pursuant to qualified cooperative purchasing agreements. Purchases made by certified purchasing offices of state agencies or governing authorities under cooperative purchasing agreements previously approved by the Office of Purchasing and Travel and established by or for any municipality, county, parish or state government or the federal government, provided that the notification to potential contractors includes a clause that sets forth the availability of the cooperative purchasing agreement to other governmental entities. Such purchases shall only be made if the use of the cooperative purchasing agreements is determined to be in the best interest of the governmental entity.

School yearbooks. Purchases of school yearbooks by state agencies or governing authorities; provided, however, that state agencies and governing authorities shall use for these purchases the RFP process as set forth in the Mississippi Procurement Manual adopted by the Office of Purchasing and Travel.

Design-build method and dual-phase design-build method of contracting. Contracts entered into under the provisions of Section 31-7-13.1, 37-101-44 or 65-1-85.

Toll roads and bridge construction projects. Contracts entered into under the provisions of Section 65-43-1 or 65-43-3.

Certain purchases under Section 57-1-221. Contracts entered into pursuant to the provisions of Section 57-1-221.

Certain transfers made pursuant to the provisions of Section 57-105-1(7).Transfers of public property or facilities under Section 57-105-1(7) and construction related to such public property or facilities.

Certain purchases or transfers entered into with local electrical power associations. Contracts or agreements entered into under the provisions of Section 55-3-33.

Certain purchases by an academic medical center or health sciences school. Purchases by an academic medical center or health sciences school, as defined in Section 37-115-50, of commodities that are used for clinical purposes and 1. intended for use in the diagnosis of disease or other conditions or in the cure, mitigation, treatment or prevention of disease, and 2. medical devices, biological, drugs and radiation-emitting devices as defined by the United States Food and Drug Administration.

Certain purchases made under the Alyce G. Clarke Mississippi Lottery Law. Contracts made by the Mississippi Lottery Corporation pursuant to the Alyce G. Clarke Mississippi Lottery Law.

Term contract authorization. All contracts for the purchase of:

All contracts for the purchase of commodities, equipment and public construction (including, but not limited to, repair and maintenance), may be let for periods of not more than sixty (60) months in advance, subject to applicable statutory provisions prohibiting the letting of contracts during specified periods near the end of terms of office. Term contracts for a period exceeding twenty-four (24) months shall also be subject to ratification or cancellation by governing authority boards taking office subsequent to the governing authority board entering the contract.

Bid proposals and contracts may include price adjustment clauses with relation to the cost to the contractor based upon a nationally published industry-wide or nationally published and recognized cost index. The cost index used in a price adjustment clause shall be determined by the Department of Finance and Administration for the state agencies and by the governing board for governing authorities. The bid proposal and contract documents utilizing a price adjustment clause shall contain the basis and method of adjusting unit prices for the change in the cost of such commodities, equipment and public construction.

Purchase law violation prohibition and vendor penalty. No contract or purchase as herein authorized shall be made for the purpose of circumventing the provisions of this section requiring competitive bids, nor shall it be lawful for any person or concern to submit individual invoices for amounts within those authorized for a contract or purchase where the actual value of the contract or commodity purchased exceeds the authorized amount and the invoices therefor are split so as to appear to be authorized as purchases for which competitive bids are not required. Submission of such invoices shall constitute a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) nor more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or by imprisonment for thirty (30) days in the county jail, or both such fine and imprisonment. In addition, the claim or claims submitted shall be forfeited.

Electrical utility petroleum-based equipment purchase procedure. When in response to a proper advertisement therefor, no bid firm as to price is submitted to an electric utility for power transformers, distribution transformers, power breakers, reclosers or other articles containing a petroleum product, the electric utility may accept the lowest and best bid therefor although the price is not firm.

Fuel management system bidding procedure. Any governing authority or agency of the state shall, before contracting for the services and products of a fuel management or fuel access system, enter into negotiations with not fewer than two (2) sellers of fuel management or fuel access systems for competitive written bids to provide the services and products for the systems. In the event that the governing authority or agency cannot locate two (2) sellers of such systems or cannot obtain bids from two (2) sellers of such systems, it shall show proof that it made a diligent, good-faith effort to locate and negotiate with two (2) sellers of such systems. Such proof shall include, but not be limited to, publications of a request for proposals and letters soliciting negotiations and bids. For purposes of this paragraph (q), a fuel management or fuel access system is an automated system of acquiring fuel for vehicles as well as management reports detailing fuel use by vehicles and drivers, and the term “competitive written bid” shall have the meaning as defined in paragraph (b) of this section. Governing authorities and agencies shall be exempt from this process when contracting for the services and products of fuel management or fuel access systems under the terms of a state contract established by the Office of Purchasing and Travel.

Solid waste contract proposal procedure. Before entering into any contract for garbage collection or disposal, contract for solid waste collection or disposal or contract for sewage collection or disposal, which involves an expenditure of more than Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00), a governing authority or agency shall issue publicly a request for proposals concerning the specifications for such services which shall be advertised for in the same manner as provided in this section for seeking bids for purchases which involve an expenditure of more than the amount provided in paragraph (c) of this section. Any request for proposals when issued shall contain terms and conditions relating to price, financial responsibility, technology, legal responsibilities and other relevant factors as are determined by the governing authority or agency to be appropriate for inclusion; all factors determined relevant by the governing authority or agency or required by this paragraph (r) shall be duly included in the advertisement to elicit proposals. After responses to the request for proposals have been duly received, the governing authority or agency shall select the most qualified proposal or proposals on the basis of price, technology and other relevant factors and from such proposals, but not limited to the terms thereof, negotiate and enter into contracts with one or more of the persons or firms submitting proposals. If the governing authority or agency deems none of the proposals to be qualified or otherwise acceptable, the request for proposals process may be reinitiated. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this paragraph, where a county with at least thirty-five thousand (35,000) nor more than forty thousand (40,000) population, according to the 1990 federal decennial census, owns or operates a solid waste landfill, the governing authorities of any other county or municipality may contract with the governing authorities of the county owning or operating the landfill, pursuant to a resolution duly adopted and spread upon the minutes of each governing authority involved, for garbage or solid waste collection or disposal services through contract negotiations.

Minority set-aside authorization. Notwithstanding any provision of this section to the contrary, any agency or governing authority, by order placed on its minutes, may, in its discretion, set aside not more than twenty percent (20%) of its anticipated annual expenditures for the purchase of commodities from minority businesses; however, all such set-aside purchases shall comply with all purchasing regulations promulgated by the Department of Finance and Administration and shall be subject to bid requirements under this section. Set-aside purchases for which competitive bids are required shall be made from the lowest and best minority business bidder. For the purposes of this paragraph, the term “minority business” means a business which is owned by a majority of persons who are United States citizens or permanent resident aliens (as defined by the Immigration and Naturalization Service) of the United States, and who are Asian, Black, Hispanic or Native American, according to the following definitions:

“Asian” means persons having origins in any of the original people of the Far East, Southeast Asia, the Indian subcontinent, or the Pacific Islands.

“Black” means persons having origins in any black racial group of Africa.

“Hispanic” means persons of Spanish or Portuguese culture with origins in Mexico, South or Central America, or the Caribbean Islands, regardless of race.

“Native American” means persons having origins in any of the original people of North America, including American Indians, Eskimos and Aleuts.

Construction punch list restriction. The architect, engineer or other representative designated by the agency or governing authority that is contracting for public construction or renovation may prepare and submit to the contractor only one (1) preliminary punch list of items that do not meet the contract requirements at the time of substantial completion and one (1) final list immediately before final completion and final payment.

Procurement of construction services by state institutions of higher learning. Contracts for privately financed construction of auxiliary facilities on the campus of a state institution of higher learning may be awarded by the Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning to the lowest and best bidder, where sealed bids are solicited, or to the offeror whose proposal is determined to represent the best value to the citizens of the State of Mississippi, where requests for proposals are solicited.

Insurability of bidders for public construction or other public contracts. In any solicitation for bids to perform public construction or other public contracts to which this section applies including, but not limited to, contracts for repair and maintenance, for which the contract will require insurance coverage in an amount of not less than One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00), bidders shall be permitted to either submit proof of current insurance coverage in the specified amount or demonstrate ability to obtain the required coverage amount of insurance if the contract is awarded to the bidder. Proof of insurance coverage shall be submitted within five (5) business days from bid acceptance.

Purchase authorization clarification. Nothing in this section shall be construed as authorizing any purchase not authorized by law.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 9024-08; Laws, 1962, ch. 497, § 8; Laws, 1980, ch. 440, § 6; Laws, 1981, ch. 306, § 2; Laws, 1982, ch. 449, § 1; Laws, 1983, ch. 330, § 3, ch. 341; Laws, 1984, ch. 363; Laws, 1984, ch. 480, § 3; Laws, 1984, ch. 488, § 158; Laws, 1985, ch. 493, § 6; Laws, 1986, ch. 398; Laws, 1986, ch. 489, § 14; Laws, 1988, ch. 351; Laws, 1988, ch. 589, § 23; Laws, 1988 Ex Sess, ch. 14, § 65; Laws, 1989, ch. 349, § 1; Laws, 1989, ch. 394, § 3; Laws, 1990, ch. 534, § 27; Laws, 1990, ch. 545, § 2; Laws, 1990, ch. 561, § 2; Laws, 1990, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 51, § 2; Laws, 1991, ch. 337, § 1; Laws, 1991, ch. 523, § 1; Laws, 1992, ch. 571 § 3; Laws, 1993, ch. 418, § 2; Laws, 1993, ch. 617, § 12; Laws, 1993, ch. 556, § 3; Laws, 1994, ch. 471, § 2; Laws, 1994 Ex Sess, ch. 26, § 22; Laws, 1996, ch. 495, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 593, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 574, § 6; Laws, 1999, ch. 407, § 1; Laws, 1999, ch. 459, § 1; Laws, 2000, ch. 428, § 3; Laws, 2000, ch. 593, § 9; Laws, 2000, 3rd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 13; Laws, 2001, ch. 333, § 2; Laws, 2002, ch. 563, § 1; Laws, 2003, ch. 539, § 5; Laws, 2004, ch. 394, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 577, § 2; Laws, 2004, 3rd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 190; Laws, 2005, ch. 504, § 5; Laws, 2006, ch. 446, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 423, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 424, § 2; Laws, 2007, ch. 494, § 7; Laws, 2007, ch. 582, § 22; Laws, 2008, ch. 417, § 1; Laws, 2008, ch. 469, § 1; brought forward without change, Laws, 2008, ch. 544, § 4; Laws, 2009, ch. 538, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 301, § 7; Laws, 2010, ch. 533, § 26; Laws, 2011, ch. 485, § 2; Laws, 2012, ch. 446, § 2; Laws, 2013, ch. 390, § 1; Laws, 2013, ch. 466, § 3; Laws, 2013, ch. 519, § 1; Laws, 2015, ch. 488, § 1; Laws, 2017, ch. 398, § 5; Laws, 2017, ch. 400, § 16; Laws, 2017, ch. 411, § 1, eff from and after Jan. 1, 2018; Laws, 2018, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 2, § 51, eff from and after September 1, 2018.